District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2819

Slot machines.

Repealed.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 625, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 19
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 553, ch. 366
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title I,§ 104(k), 23 DCR 2461
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(16), 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2819.
1973 Ed., § 47-2319.